Arkansas, session 2025, HB1538.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) The state's income tax laws should be amended to modernize
and simplify the tax code, increase Arkansas's competitiveness, create jobs,
and ensure fairness to all taxpayers;
(2) Net operating loss carry-forward provisions promote tax
neutrality by reducing tax burdens on businesses with cyclical income streams
or exposure to economic downturns, regardless of size or age;
(3) Longer net operating loss carry-forward provisions promote
longevity and facilitate future growth in start-up businesses, expansion of
existing operations, and new facility locations; and
(4) Federal net operating losses are carried forward
indefinitely up to eighty percent (80%) in one (1) year, and many states
*JLL216*
02/20/2025 7:07:30 AM JLL216

HB1538
conform to the federal law or provide uncapped twenty-year carry-forward
periods, while Arkansas is in the minority with a ten-year carry-forward
period.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 15-4-2404(a), concerning the net operating
loss deduction carry-forward period for certain steel manufacturers, is
amended to read as follows:
(a) Taxpayers qualified for the benefits of this subchapter and
entitled to a net operating loss deduction as provided in § 26-51-427 may
carry forward that deduction to the next-succeeding taxable year following
the year of the net operating loss and annually thereafter for a total period
of ten (10) twenty (20) years or until the net operating loss has been
exhausted, whichever is earlier.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 26-51-427(1)(C)(i), concerning the carry-
forward period for the income tax deduction for net operating loss, is
amended to read as follows:
(C)(i) For net operating losses occurring in taxable years
beginning on or after January 1, 2020, the net operating loss may be carried
over to the next succeeding taxable year and annually thereafter for the
following number of years next succeeding the tax year of the net operating
loss or until the net operating loss has been exhausted or absorbed by the
taxable income of a succeeding year, whichever is earlier:
(a) For net operating losses occurring in the
tax year beginning January 1, 2020, a total period of eight (8) years; and
(b) For net operating losses occurring in tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2021, a total period of ten (10)
years; and
(c) For net operating losses occurring in tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, a total period of twenty (20)
years.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 26-51-427(1)(E)(ii), concerning the carry-
forward period for the income tax deduction for net operating loss, is
amended to read as follows:
(ii) In the case of a qualified medical company, a
02/20/2025 7:07:30 AM JLL216

HB1538
net operating loss for any taxable year shall be a net operating loss
carryover to each of the fifteen (15) twenty (20) taxable years following the
taxable year of the loss.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 26-51-427(1)(E)(iv), concerning the carry-
forward period for the income tax deduction for net operating loss, is
amended to read as follows:
(iv) The net operating loss provisions stated in
this subdivision (1)(E), which resulted from the operation of a qualified
medical company, are effective for taxable years beginning on and after
January 1, 1987 2025;

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 26-51-1203(a), concerning the carry-forward
period for the net operating loss deduction for certain steel mills, is
amended to read as follows:
(a) Taxpayers qualified under § 26-51-1202(a) and (b), entitled to a
net operating loss deduction as provided in § 26-51-427, may carry forward
that deduction to the next succeeding taxable year following the year of the
net operating loss and annually thereafter for a total period of ten (10)
twenty (20) years or until the net operating loss has been exhausted,
whichever is earlier.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 26-51-1213(a), concerning the carry-forward
period for the net operating loss deduction for certain steel mills, is
amended to read as follows:
(a) Taxpayers qualified under § 26-51-1212(2) and entitled to a net
operating loss deduction as provided in § 26-51-427 may carry forward that
deduction to the next-succeeding taxable year following the year of such net
operating loss and annually thereafter for a total period of ten (10) twenty
(20) years or until such net operating loss has been exhausted, whichever is
earlier.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 26-52-913 is amended to read as follows:
26-52-913. Net operating loss deduction — Carry forward.
Taxpayers qualified under § 26-52-912(2) and entitled to a net
operating loss deduction as provided in § 26-51-427 may carry forward that
02/20/2025 7:07:30 AM JLL216

HB1538
deduction to the next-succeeding taxable year following the year of the net
operating loss and annually thereafter for a total period of ten (10) twenty
(20) years or until the net operating loss has been exhausted, whichever is
earlier. The net operating loss deduction must be carried forward in the
order named above.

SECTION 9. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 1–8 of this act are effective for
tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.




























02/20/2025 7:07:30 AM JLL216